Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20203-304.01
Joint airport zoning board; members;
term.

If
a joint airport zoning board is created pursuant to section 3-304, such board
shall have two representatives appointed by each political subdivision participating
in its creation as members thereof and also a chairperson elected by a majority
of the members so appointed. The term of each member shall be four years.

Laws 2013, LB140, § 5.